California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(ab) Revocation, suspension, or restriction by the board of a license, certificate, or registration to practice as a professional clinical counselor, clinical social worker, educational psychologist, or marriage and family therapist.

(ac) Failure to comply with the procedures set forth in Section 2290.5 when delivering health care via telehealth.

(ad) Willful violation of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 91.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.91.

The board may deny any application, or may suspend or revoke any license or registration issued under this chapter, for any of the following:

(a) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action imposed by this state or another state or territory of the United States, or by any other governmental agency, on a license, certificate, or registration to practice professional clinical counseling or any other healing art shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct. A certified copy of the disciplinary action decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(b) Revocation,
 suspension, or restriction by the board of a license, certificate, or registration to practice clinical social work, professional clinical counseling, marriage and family therapy, or educational psychology shall also constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 40.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.92.

(a) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall require an applicant for professional clinical counselor licensure or registration as an associate professional clinical counselor, as defined in Sections 4999.12, 4999.20, and 4999.30, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the
 Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 18.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [4999.100. - 4999.121.]

4999.100.

(a) An associate registration shall expire one year from the last day of the month in which it was issued.

(b) To renew a registration, the registrant, on or before the expiration date of the registration, shall do the following:

(1) Apply for a renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay a renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(3) Notify the board whether they have
 been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the registrant’s last renewal.

(4) Participate in the California law and ethics examination pursuant to Section 4999.53 each year until successful completion of this examination.

(5) Certify under penalty of perjury their compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4999.76.

(c) An expired registration may be renewed by completing all of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to
 (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(d) The associate registration may be renewed a maximum of five times. Registration shall not be renewed or reinstated beyond six years from the last day of the month during which it was issued, regardless of whether it has been revoked. When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and obtain a subsequent associate registration number if the applicant meets the educational requirements for registration in effect at the time of the application for a subsequent associate registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination described in Section 4999.53. An applicant who is issued a subsequent associate registration number pursuant to this subdivision shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 16.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.102.

(a) Licenses issued under this chapter shall expire no more than 24 months after the issue date. The expiration date of the original license shall be set by the board.

(b) To renew an unexpired license described in subdivision (a), the licensee, on or before the expiration date of the license, shall do all of the following:

(1) Apply for a renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay a two‑year renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(3) Certify compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section
 4999.76.

(4) Notify the board whether he or she has been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the licensee’s last renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 148, Sec. 9.   (SB 274)   Effective August 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.104.

Licenses issued under this chapter that have expired may be renewed at any time within three years of expiration. To renew an expired license described in this section, the licensee shall do all of the following:

(a) File an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(b) Pay a two-year renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(c) Pay a delinquency fee.

(d) Certify compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4999.76.

(e) Notify the board whether the licensee has been convicted, as defined
 in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the licensee’s last renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 70.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.106.

A license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued, except that a former licensee may apply for and obtain a new license if he or she complies with all of the following:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists that, if the license were issued, would justify its revocation or suspension.

(b) He or she takes and passes the current examinations required for licensing.

(c) He or she submits an application for initial licensure.

(d) He or she meets
 the requirements pursuant to Section
 4999.51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 82.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.108.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but that renewal does not entitle the licensee, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.110.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee shall, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.112.

(a) A licensed professional clinical counselor may apply to the board to request that his or her license be placed on inactive status. A licensee who holds an inactive license shall do all of the following:

(1) Pay a biennial fee of one-half of the active renewal fee.

(2) Be exempt from continuing education requirements.

(3) Not engage in the practice of professional clinical counseling in this state.

(4) Otherwise be subject to this chapter.

(b) A licensee on inactive status may have
 his or her license reactivated by complying with all of the following:

(1) Submitting a request to the board.

(2) Certifying that he or she has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure.

(3) Paying the remaining one-half of the renewal fee.

(4) Completing the following continuing education requirements:

(A) Eighteen hours of continuing education is required within the two years preceding the date of the request for reactivation if the license will expire less than one year from the date of the request for reactivation.

(B) Thirty-six hours of continuing education is required within the two
 years preceding the date of the request for reactivation if the license will expire more than one year from the date of the request for reactivation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.113.

(a) (1) The board shall issue, upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, a retired license to a professional clinical counselor who holds a license that is current and active or a license that is inactive, and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(2) A professional clinical counselor license that has expired shall be issued a retired license by the board upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter if both of the
 following requirements are met:

(A) The license expired within three years from the date of the board’s receipt of a completed application.

(B) Immediately preceding the license expiration, and after the license expiration, the license was not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this section, “subject to disciplinary action” shall mean that the licensee had an unsatisfied cost recovery, fine or restitution order, an accusation or petition to revoke probation that has been served on the licensee alleging violations of their probation or the chapter, or an unresolved complaint or investigation pending with the
 board.

(b) To apply for a retired license, the applicant shall submit a completed application to the board providing all of the following information:

(1) Full name as filed with the board.

(2) Board license type, license number, and expiration date.

(3) Date of birth.

(4) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(5) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant understands that the holder of a retired license may not
 engage in any activity for which the active license was issued, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to retired status.

(c) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active professional clinical counselor license is required.

(d) The holder of a retired license shall utilize their professional
 title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title. 

(e) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(f) The holder of a retired license may apply to restore to active status their license to practice professional clinical counseling if that retired license was issued less than three years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. A retired license may be restored to active status one time only. To restore a retired license to active status, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Submit a completed application to the board containing all of the
 following information:

(A) Full name as filed with the board.

(B) Original board license type and original license number and expiration date.

(C) Date of birth.

(D) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(E) Whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state subsequent to the issuance of the retired license.

(F) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that
 the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant did not engage in any activity for which an active license is required while the license was in retired status, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to “active” status. 

(2) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure.

(3) Pays the required renewal fee.

(4) Completes the required continuing education as specified in Section 4999.76.

(5) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(g) An applicant
 requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section less than one year from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 18 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(h) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section one or more years from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 36 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the
 application to restore the retired license is received by the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(i) A retired license that was issued three or more years prior shall not be restored. The holder of the retired license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure.

(2) Applies for licensure and pays the required fees.

(3) Passes the examinations required for licensure.

(4) Complies with the fingerprint submission
 requirements established in Section 144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 92.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.114.

The board shall report each month to the Controller the amount and source of all revenue received pursuant to this chapter and at the same time deposit the entire amount thereof in the State Treasury for credit to the Behavioral Sciences Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.116.

(a) The moneys credited to the Behavioral Sciences Fund under Section 4999.114 shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used for the purposes of carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The board shall keep records that will reasonably ensure that funds expended in the administration of each licensing or registration category bear a reasonable relation to the revenue derived from each category, and shall so notify the department no later than May 31 of each year.

(c) Surpluses, if any, may be used in a way so as to bear a reasonable relation to the revenue derived from each category, and may include, but not be limited to, expenditures for
 education and research related to each of the licensing or registration categories.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.118.

A licensee or registrant shall give written notice to the board of a name change, giving both the old and new names. The written notice shall be submitted to the board within 30 days of the issuance of a new government-issued photographic identification. The licensee or registrant shall certify the information is correct by signing a statement under penalty of perjury. A copy of both of the following documents evidencing the change shall be submitted with the notice:

(a) A current government-issued photographic identification.

(b) The legal document authorizing the name change, such as a court order or a marriage
 certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 24.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.120.

(a) The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of professional clinical counselors:

(1) The fee for the application for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) The fee for the application for associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(3) (A) (i) The fee for the board-administered clinical examination,
 if the board chooses to adopt this examination in regulations, shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(ii) The fee for the California law and ethics examination shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(B) An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, after having been scheduled to take the examination, shall forfeit the examination fees.

(C) The amount of the examination fees shall be based on the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading each examination and the actual cost to the board of administering each examination. The written examination fees
 shall be adjusted periodically by regulation to reflect the actual costs incurred by the board.

(4) The fee for the issuance of a license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(5) The fee for the annual renewal of an associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(6) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(7) The renewal delinquency fee shall be one-half of
 the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire shall be subject to the delinquency fee.

(8) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).

(9) The fee for rescoring an examination shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(10) The fee for issuance of a replacement license or registration shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(11) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 71.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.121.

(a) In addition to the fees charged pursuant to Section 4999.120 for the biennial renewal of a license pursuant to Section 4999.102, the board shall collect an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20) at the time of renewal. The board shall transfer this amount to the Controller who shall deposit the funds in the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 557, Sec. 7.   (AB 1188)   Effective October 7, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Professional Clinical Counselor Corporations [4999.123. - 4999.129.]

4999.123.

A professional clinical counselor corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees who are rendering professional services are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, and any other statute or regulation pertaining to that corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to a professional clinical counselor corporation, the term “governmental agency” in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) shall be construed to mean the Board of Behavioral
 Sciences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 73.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.124.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in, or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or any regulation adopted under those laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 13.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.125.

The name of a professional clinical counselor corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services shall contain the words “licensed professional clinical counselor” or “professional clinical counselor” and wording or abbreviations denoting a corporate existence. A professional clinical counselor corporation that conducts business under a fictitious business name shall not use any name that is false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall inform each patient, prior to commencement of treatment, that the business is conducted by a professional clinical counselor corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 13.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.126.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a professional clinical counselor corporation shall be a licensed person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 13.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.127.

The income of a professional clinical counselor corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or his or her shares in the professional clinical counselor corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 13.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.128.

A professional clinical counselor corporation shall not perform or fail to perform any act the performance of which, or for which the failure to perform, would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule, or regulation. In the conduct of its practice, a professional clinical counselor corporation shall observe and be bound by any statute, rule, or regulation that applies to a licensed professional clinical counselor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 13.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.129.

The board may formulate and enforce any rule or regulation to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including as follows:

(a) Any rule or regulation that requires that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a professional clinical counselor corporation shall include a provision that requires the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, or a deceased person to be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within the timeframe that the rule or regulation requires.

(b) Any rule or regulation that requires that a professional
 clinical counselor corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against the corporation by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 13.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 17. Qualified Autism Service Providers [4999.200. - 4999.202.]

4999.200.

“Qualified autism service provider” means an individual who meets either of the following criteria:

(a) Is certified by a national entity, such as the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, with a certification that is accredited by the National Commission for Certifying Agencies who designs, supervises, or provides treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism, provided the services are within the experience and competence of the individual who is nationally certified.

(b) Is licensed as a physician and surgeon, physical therapist, occupational therapist, psychologist, marriage and family therapist, educational
 psychologist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, speech-language pathologist, or audiologist, pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), and who designs, supervises, or provides treatment for pervasive developmental disorder or autism, provided the services are within the experience and competence of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.201.

“Qualified autism service professional” means an individual who meets all of the following criteria:

(a) Provides behavioral health treatment, which may include clinical case management and case supervision under the direction and supervision of a qualified autism service provider.

(b) Is supervised by a qualified autism service provider.

(c) Provides treatment pursuant to a treatment plan developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider.

(d) Is either of the following:

(1) A behavioral service provider who meets the education and experience qualifications described in Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations for an Associate Behavior Analyst, Behavior Analyst, Behavior Management Assistant, Behavior Management Consultant, or Behavior Management Program.

(2) (A) A psychological associate, an associate marriage and family therapist, an associate clinical social worker, or an associate professional clinical counselor, as defined and regulated by the Board of Behavioral Sciences or the Board of Psychology.

(B) If an individual meets the requirement described in subparagraph (A), they shall also meet the criteria set forth in the regulations
 adopted pursuant to Section 4686.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for a Behavioral Health Professional.

(e) (1) Has training and experience in providing services for pervasive developmental disorder or autism pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

(f) Is employed by the qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers responsible for the autism treatment plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.202.

“Qualified autism service paraprofessional” means an unlicensed and uncertified individual who meets all of the following criteria:

(a) Is supervised by a qualified autism service provider or qualified autism service professional at a level of clinical supervision that meets professionally recognized standards of practice.

(b) Provides treatment and implements services pursuant to a treatment plan that was developed and approved by the qualified autism service provider.

(c) Meets the education and training qualifications described in Section 54342 of
 Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) Has adequate education, training, and experience, as certified by a qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers.

(e) Is employed by the qualified autism service provider or an entity or group that employs qualified autism service providers responsible for the autism treatment plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. PROFESSIONS AND VOCATIONS GENERALLY [5000. - 9998.12.]



CHAPTER 1. Accountants [5000. - 5158.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [5000. - 5025.3.]

5000.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the California Board of Accountancy, which consists of 15 members, 7 of whom shall be licensees, and 8 of whom shall be public members who shall not be licentiates of the board or registered by the board. The board has the powers and duties conferred by this chapter.

(b) The Governor shall appoint four of the public members, and the seven licensee members as provided in this section. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint two public members. In appointing the seven licensee members, the Governor shall appoint individuals representing a cross section of the accounting profession.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. However, the review of the board shall be limited to reports or studies specified in this chapter and those issues identified by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and the board regarding the implementation of new licensing requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5000.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the California Board of Accountancy in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5000.5.

No public member shall be a current or former licensee of the board or an immediate family member of a licensee, or be currently or formerly employed by a public accounting firm, bookkeeping firm, or firm engaged in providing tax preparation as its primary business, or have any financial interest in the business of a licensee. Each public member shall meet all of the requirements for public membership on the board as set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 450) of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), each member of the board, except the public members, shall be actively engaged in the practice of public accountancy and shall have been so engaged for a period of not less than five years preceding the date of his appointment. Each member shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of this state for at least five years next preceding his appointment, and shall be of good character. Within 30 days after their appointment, the members of the board shall take and subscribe to the oath of office as prescribed by the Government Code and shall file the same with the Secretary of State.

(b) One licensee member appointed by the Governor may be an active educator within a program that emphasizes the study of accounting within a college, university, or four-year educational institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 807, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

Each member shall be appointed for a term of four years and shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of his successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which he was appointed, whichever first occurs.

Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term of a person licensed in the same capacity as the person being replaced. No person shall serve more than two terms consecutively. The Governor shall remove from the board any member, except a public member, whose permit to practice has become void, revoked or suspended. The Governor may, after hearing, remove any member of the board for neglect of duty or other just cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

The officers of the board are a president, vice president and a secretary-treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

The president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer shall be elected by the board for a term of one year from among its members at the time of the annual meeting. The newly elected president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer shall assume the duties of their respective offices at the conclusion of the annual meeting at which they were elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1137, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

The officers of the board shall continue in office until their successors are elected and qualify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1353.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

The president shall preside at all meetings of the board, and in the event of the president’s absence or inability to act, the vice president shall preside. If both the president and vice president are absent or unable to act, the secretary-treasurer shall preside at meetings of the board. The president may designate a board member who is not an officer to preside at a meeting of the board if all officers of the board are absent or unable to act at that meeting. Other duties of the president, vice president, and the duties of the secretary-treasurer, shall be such as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   (AB 298)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

The board shall, from time to time, but not less than twice each year, prepare and distribute to all licensees, a report of the activities of the board, including amendments to this chapter and regulations adopted by the board, and may likewise distribute reports of other matters of interest to the public and to practitioners. The board may meet this requirement by electronically distributing these materials via email or making them available on the board’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

The board shall compile and maintain, or may have compiled and maintained on its behalf, a register of licensees that contains information that the board determines is necessary for the purposes for which the board was established. The board shall make the register available to any licensee and to the public.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.5.

In the interest of protecting the privacy of applicants and licensees, an email address provided by applicants or licensees to the board pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required pursuant to a court order by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 8.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

The board may adopt, repeal, or amend such regulations as may be reasonably necessary and expedient for the orderly conduct of its affairs and for the administration of this chapter. The regulations shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

The board shall designate the location of its principal office and may establish branch offices in other locations.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5016 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

The board shall have a seal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

5013.

The board shall keep records of all proceedings and actions by and before the board and before its committees. In any proceeding in court, civil or criminal, copies of those records certified as correct by the executive officer of the board under seal of the board shall be admissible in evidence and shall be prima facie evidence of the correctness of the contents thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 37.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.

The board may employ clerks, examiners and, except as provided by Section 159.5, other assistants in the performance of its duties, and pay salaries and necessary expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.6.

The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in the executive officer by this chapter.
